Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 2. Decedent’s Estate or Terminating Income Interest

§ 3331.
Determination and distribution of net income.

After a decedent dies, in the case of an estate, or after an income interest in a trust ends, the following rules apply:

A fiduciary of an estate or of a terminating income interest shall determine the amount of net income and net principal receipts received from property specifically given to a beneficiary under the rules in subchapters 3, 4, and 5 of this chapter which apply to trustees and under the rules in subdivision (5) of this section. The fiduciary shall distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary who is to receive the specific property.

A fiduciary shall determine the remaining net income of a decedent’s estate or a terminating income interest under the rules in subchapters 3, 4, and 5 of this chapter which apply to trustees and by:

including in net income all income from property used to discharge liabilities;

paying from income or principal, in the fiduciary’s discretion, fees of attorneys, accountants, and fiduciaries; court costs and other expenses of administration; and interest on death taxes, but the fiduciary may pay those expenses from income of property passing to a trust for which the fiduciary claims an estate tax marital or charitable deduction only to the extent that the payment of those expenses from income will not cause the reduction or loss of the deduction; and

paying from principal all other disbursements made or incurred in connection with the settlement of a decedent’s estate or the winding up of a terminating income interest, including debts, funeral expenses, disposition of remains, family allowances, and death taxes and related penalties that are apportioned to the estate or terminating income interest by the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law.

Unless the will or trust instrument otherwise provides, or the court otherwise directs, a fiduciary shall distribute to a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount outright interest from the date that is one year following the date of death of the person whose death gives rise to the payment of the pecuniary bequest or the happening of the contingency that causes the income interest to end, from net income determined under subdivision (2) of this section or from principal to the extent that net income is insufficient. However, this subdivision shall not apply to a pecuniary bequest:

to or for the benefit of a decedent’s surviving spouse that is or can be qualified for the federal estate tax marital deduction; or

to or for the benefit of charitable organizations that are qualified for the federal estate tax charitable deduction, including a charitable remainder trust.

A fiduciary shall distribute the net income remaining after distributions required by subdivision (3) of this section in the manner described in section 3332 of this title to all other beneficiaries.

A fiduciary may not reduce principal or income receipts from property described in subdivision (1) of this section because of a payment described in section 3371 or 3372 of this title to the extent that the will, the terms of the trust, or applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property or to the extent that the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the payment from a third party. The net income and principal receipts from the property are determined by including all of the amounts the fiduciary receives or pays with respect to the property, whether those amounts accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of a decedent’s death or an income interest’s terminating event, and by making a reasonable provision for amounts that the fiduciary believes the estate or terminating income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is distributed.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Terminating income interests and successive income interests.

A trust that provides for a single income beneficiary and an outright distribution of the remainder ends when the income interest ends.
A more complex trust may have a number of income interests, either concurrent or successive, and the trust will not necessarily end when one of the income interests ends.
For that reason, the Act speaks in terms of income interests ending and beginning rather than trusts ending and beginning.
When an income interest in a trust ends, the trustee’s powers continue during the winding up period required to complete its administration.
A terminating income interest is one that has ended but whose administration is not complete.

If two or more people are given the right to receive specified percentages or fractions of the income from a trust concurrently and one of the concurrent interests ends, e.g., when a beneficiary dies, the beneficiary’s income interest ends but the trust does not.
Similarly, when a trust with only one income beneficiary ends upon the beneficiary’s death, the trust instrument may provide that part or all of the trust assets shall continue in trust for another income beneficiary.
While it is common to think and speak of this (and even to characterize it in a trust instrument) as a “new” trust, it is a continuation of the original trust for a remainder beneficiary who has an income interest in the trust assets instead of the right to receive them outright.
For purposes of this Act, this is a successive income interest in the same trust.
The fact that a trust may or may not end when an income interest ends is not significant for purposes of this Act.

If the assets that are subject to a terminating income interest pass to another trust because the income beneficiary exercises a general power of appointment over the trust assets, the recipient trust would be a new trust; and if they pass to another trust because the beneficiary exercises a nongeneral power of appointment over the trust assets, the recipient trust might be a new trust in some States (see 5A Austin W. Scott & William F. Fratcher, The Law of Trusts § 640, at 483 (4th ed. 1989)); but for purposes of this Act a new trust created in these circumstances is also a successive income interest.

Gift of a pecuniary amount.

Subdivisions 3331(3) and (4) provide different rules for an outright gift of a pecuniary amount and a gift in trust of a pecuniary amount; this is the same approach used in Section 5(b)(2) of the 1962 Act.

Interest on pecuniary amounts.

Subdivision 3331(3) provides that the beneficiary of an outright pecuniary amount is to receive the interest or other amount provided by applicable law if there is no provision in the will or the terms of the trust.
Many states have no applicable law that provides for interest or some other amount to be paid on an outright pecuniary gift under an inter vivos trust; this section provides that in such a case the interest or other amount to be paid shall be the same as the interest or other amount required to be paid on testamentary pecuniary gifts. This provision is intended to accord gifts under inter vivos instruments the same treatment as testamentary gifts.
The various state authorities that provide for the amount that a beneficiary of an outright pecuniary amount is entitled to receive are collected in Richard B. Covey, Marital Deduction and Credit Shelter Dispositions and the Use of Formula Provisions, App. B (4th ed. 1997).

Administration expenses and interest on death taxes.

Under subdivision 3331(2)(B) a fiduciary may pay administration expenses and interest on death taxes from either income or principal.
An advantage of permitting the fiduciary to choose the source of the payment is that, if the fiduciary’s decision is consistent with the decision to deduct these expenses for income tax purposes or estate tax purposes, it eliminates the need to adjust between principal and income that may arise when, for example, an expense that is paid from principal is deducted for income tax purposes or an expense that is paid from income is deducted for estate tax purposes.

The United States Supreme Court has considered the question of whether an estate tax marital deduction or charitable deduction should be reduced when administration expenses are paid from income produced by property passing in trust for a surviving spouse or for charity and deducted for income tax purposes.
The Court rejected the IRS position that administration expenses properly paid from income under the terms of the trust or state law must reduce the amount of a marital or charitable transfer, and held that the value of the transferred property is not reduced for estate tax purposes unless the administration expenses are material in light of the income the trust corpus could have been expected to generate.
Commissioner v. Estate of Otis C. Hubert,
117 S. Ct. 1124 (1997).
The provision in subdivision 3331(2)(B) permits a fiduciary to pay and deduct administration expenses from income only to the extent that it will not cause the reduction or loss of an estate tax marital or charitable contributions deduction, which means that the limit on the amount payable from income will be established eventually by Treasury Regulations.

Interest on estate taxes.

The IRS agrees that interest on estate and inheritance taxes may be deducted for income tax purposes without having to reduce the estate tax deduction for amounts passing to a charity or surviving spouse, whether the interest is paid from principal or income.
Rev. Rul. 93-48, 93-2 C.B. 270.
For estates of persons who died before 1998, a fiduciary may not want to deduct for income tax purposes interest on estate tax that is deferred under section 6166 or 6163 of the Internal Revenue Code because deducting that interest for estate tax purposes may produce more beneficial results, especially if the estate has little or no income or the income tax bracket is significantly lower than the estate tax bracket.
For estates of persons who die after 1997, no estate tax or income tax deduction will be allowed for interest paid on estate tax that is deferred under section 6166.
However, interest on estate tax deferred under section 6163 will continue to be deductible for both purposes, and interest on estate tax deficiencies will continue to be deductible for estate tax purposes if an election under section 6166 is not in effect.

Under the 1962 Act, Section 13(c)(5) charges interest on estate and inheritance taxes to principal.
The 1931 Act has no provision.
Subdivision 3371(3) of this title provides that, except to the extent provided in subdivision 3331(2)(B) or (C), all interest must be paid from income.

Vermont Comment

Determination and Distribution of Net Income.

The Vermont Act adds qualifying language to subdivision 3331(3) providing that “(u)nless the will or trust instrument otherwise provides, or the court otherwise directs(,)” and then goes on to provide that interest on a pecuniary bequest only begins to accrue one year from the date of death pursuant to
Woodward’s Estate v. Holton et al.,
78 Vt. 254 (1909).
This appears to be the only instance where the uniform act deviates from Vermont law, which the additional language preserves here. To conform to this change, the following language is deleted at the end of subdivision (4): “including a beneficiary who receives a pecuniary amount in trust, even if the beneficiary holds an unqualified power to withdraw assets from the trust or other presently exercisable general power of appointment over the trust.”

§ 3332.
Distribution to residuary and remainder beneficiaries.

Each beneficiary described in subdivision 3331(4) of this title is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to whom this section applies, each beneficiary, including one who does not receive part of the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in the net income the fiduciary has received after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date, but has not distributed as of the current distribution date.

In determining a beneficiary’s share of net income, the following rules apply:

The beneficiary is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before the distribution date, including assets that later may be sold to meet principal obligations.

The beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated without regard to property specifically given to a beneficiary and property required to pay pecuniary amounts.

The beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets must be calculated on the basis of the aggregate value of those assets as of the distribution date without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation.

The distribution date for purposes of this section may be the date as of which the fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on which assets are actually distributed.

If a fiduciary does not distribute all of the collected but undistributed net income to each person as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain appropriate records showing the interest of each beneficiary in that net income.

A fiduciary may apply the rules in this section, to the extent that the fiduciary considers it appropriate, to net gain or loss realized after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date from the disposition of a principal asset if this section applies to the income from the asset.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

HistoryComment

Relationship to prior Acts.

Section 3332 retains the concept in Section 5(b)(2) of the 1962 Act that the residuary legatees of estates are to receive net income earned during the period of administration on the basis of their proportionate interests in the undistributed assets when distributions are made.
It changes the basis for determining their proportionate interests by using asset values as of a date reasonably near the time of distribution instead of inventory values; it extends the application of these rules to distributions from terminating trusts; and it extends these rules to gain or loss realized from the disposition of assets during administration, an omission in the 1962 Act that has been noted by several commentators.
See, e.g., Richard B. Covey, Marital Deduction and Credit Shelter Dispositions and the Use of Formula Provisions 91 (4th ed. 1998); Thomas H. Cantrill, Fractional or Percentage Residuary Bequests: Allocation of Postmortem Income, Gain and Unrealized Appreciation, 10 Prob. Notes 322, 327 (1985).